Colorado, session 2026A, SB099.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The illegal manufacture, distribution, and use of synthetic
opioids, including fentanyl, has increased in recent years, presenting a
serious health and public safety risk in Colorado;
(b) Because certain controlled substances listed on schedule II are
synthetic, illegal manufacturers and distributors alter substances'
chemistry to avoid classification on schedule II;
(c) In some instances, a synthetic substance's chemistry is so
unique that there is the potential for debate, confusion, and inconsistency
within the justice system whether a substance is on schedule II or
constitutes an analog thereof;
(d) The state has a compelling interest in defending against the
serious health and public safety consequences presented by a new and
unanticipated synthetic substance proliferating faster than sufficient
legislative response; and
(e) Authorizing the governor to temporarily declare a material,
compound, mixture, or preparation that has not been specifically excluded
from or included in a schedule is a controlled substance analog in
schedule II described in existing law, is an appropriate, narrowly tailored
approach that clearly:
(I) Articulates the authority that may be executed;
(II) Assigns the authority to the governor only; and
-2- SB26-099

(III) Defines the scope of the authority, including safeguards that
prevent against abuse and noticing requirements that protect the peoples'
liberty interests.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-18-204, add (3)
as follows:
18-18-204. Schedule II.
(3) (a) UNLESS SPECIFICALLY EXCEPTED OR SPECIFICALLY
INCLUDED IN A SCHEDULE, THE GOVERNOR MAY CLASSIFY THAT A
MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION IS A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE ANALOG DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(g) OF THIS SECTION
THAT IS TREATED, FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 18, AS A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE IN SCHEDULE II IF:
(I) THE MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION'S
CHEMICAL STRUCTURE IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE CHEMICAL
STRUCTURE OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN SCHEDULE II OR WAS
SPECIFICALLY DESIGNED TO PRODUCE AN EFFECT SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR
TO OR GREATER THAN THE EFFECT OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN
SCHEDULE II, AND ALL OR PART OF WHICH IS INTENDED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION; AND
(II) (A) THE GOVERNOR ISSUES AN EXECUTIVE ORDER THAT
PROVIDES REASONABLE NOTICE TO THE PUBLIC AND THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THAT THE MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION
IS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ANALOG THAT IS TREATED, FOR PURPOSES
OF THIS ARTICLE 18, AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN SCHEDULE II; AND
(B) THE GOVERNOR PROVIDES THE DESIGNATION DATE OF WHEN
THE MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION IS A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE ANALOG THAT IS TREATED, FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 18,
-3- SB26-099

AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN SCHEDULE II.
(b) (I) THE GOVERNOR'S DESIGNATION OF THE MATERIAL,
COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE
ANALOG IS NOT EFFECTIVE AFTER 12:01 A.M. ON THE DAY THAT IS TWO
YEARS AFTER THE DESIGNATION DATE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF
THIS SECTION.
(II) THE GOVERNOR:
(A) MAY REPEAL THE DESIGNATION OF THE MATERIAL,
COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE
ANALOG ON A DATE AND TIME THAT IS EARLIER THAN THE DATE AND TIME
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION;
(B) SHALL NOT EXTEND THE DESIGNATION OF THE MATERIAL,
COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE
ANALOG TO A DATE OR TIME THAT IS LATER THAN THE DATE OR TIME
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(C) SHALL NOT RENEW THE DESIGNATION OF THE MATERIAL,
COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE
ANALOG AFTER THE EXPIRATION OR REPEAL OF THE DESIGNATION. THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(C) APPLIES IN ALL INSTANCES, INCLUDING IF THE
DESIGNATION OF THE MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION
AS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ANALOG REPEALED OR EXPIRED PRIOR TO
THE DATE OR TIME DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (3) DOES NOT PROHIBIT A COURT FROM
FINDING THAT A MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE, OR PREPARATION IS A
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ANALOG DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(g) OF
THIS SECTION.
(d) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, BY JOINT RESOLUTION, MAY
-4- SB26-099

TERMINATE THE DESIGNATION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ANALOG
MADE IN AN EXECUTIVE ORDER DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- SB26-099